Utah statutes.
54-4-29.   Acquiring voting stock or securities of like utility only on consent of commission.

Hereafter no public utility shall purchase or acquire any of the voting securities or the secured obligations of any other public utility engaged in the same general line of business without the consent and approval of the Public Service Commission, which shall be granted only after investigation and hearing and finding that such purchase and acquisition of such securities, or obligations, will be in the public interest.

